District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.04

Appointment of Director.

The Department shall be headed by a Director, who shall:

(1)

Be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council, pursuant to § 1-523.01(a);

(2)

Be qualified by experience and training to carry out the purposes of the Department as set forth in § 7-771.03; and

(3)

Serve at the pleasure of the Mayor.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 5, 55 DCR 216